Hawaii statutes.
§390-1 Definitions. As used in this
chapter:

"Adult entertainment" means an
activity to which a minor would not be able to legally gain admittance and
shall include but not be limited to:

(1) Performing of exotic entertainment;

(2) Nude, exotic, or lap dancing;

(3) Showing of film, video, still picture, electronic
reproduction, or other visual reproduction depicting:

(A) Acts or simulated acts of sexual
intercourse, masturbation, sodomy, bestiality, oral copulation, flagellation,
or any sexual acts that are prohibited by law;

(B) Any person being touched, caressed, or
fondled on the breast, buttocks, anus, or genitalia;

(C) Scenes wherein a person displays the anus
or genitalia; or

(D) Scenes wherein artificial devices or
inanimate objects are employed to depict, or drawings are employed to portray,
any of the prohibited activities described above.

"Department" means the department of
labor and industrial relations.

"Director" means the director of
labor and industrial relations.

"Employer" includes any individual,
partnership, association, joint stock company, trust, corporation, the personal
representative of the estate of a deceased individual or the receiver, trustee,
or successor of any of the same, employing any person, but shall not include
the State or any political subdivision thereof or the United States.

"Gainful occupation" means any
activity which produces pecuniary gain for any person or persons connected
therewith.

"Theatrical employment" means gainful
occupation as a model, dancer, singer, musician, entertainer or motion picture,
television, radio or theatrical performer. [L 1969, c 162, pt of §2; am L 1976,
c 200, pt of §1; am L 2003, c 61, §2]

Revision Note

Numeric designations deleted pursuant to §23G-15.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next